North Carolina, session 2025, SB803.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Beaufort County District B Created. – Beaufort County District B is
created as a taxing district. Its jurisdiction consists of that part of Beaufort County that is located
outside of the incorporated area of the City of Washington. Beaufort County District B is a body
politic and corporate and has the power to carry out the provisions of this act. The Beaufort
County Board of Commissioners shall serve ex officio as the governing body of the district, and
the officers of the county shall serve as the officers of the governing body of the district. A simple
majority of the governing body constitutes a quorum, and approval by a majority of those present
is sufficient to determine any matter before the governing body, if a quorum is present.
SECTION 2. Authorization and Scope. – The governing body of Beaufort County
District B may levy a room occupancy tax of up to six percent (6%) of the gross receipts derived
from the rental of an accommodation within the district that is subject to sales tax imposed by
the State under G.S. 105-164.4(a)(3). This tax is in addition to any State or local sales tax.
SECTION 3. Administration. – A tax levied under this act shall be levied,
administered, collected, and repealed as provided in G.S. 153A-155 as if Beaufort County
District B were a county. The penalties provided in G.S. 153A-155 apply to a tax levied under
this act.
SECTION 4. Distribution and Use of Tax Revenue. – Beaufort County District B
shall, on a quarterly basis, distribute the net proceeds of the occupancy tax to the Beaufort County
District B Tourism Development Authority created pursuant to Section 5 of this act. The
Authority shall use at least two-thirds of the funds to promote travel and tourism and shall use
the remainder for tourism-related expenditures in the district. In accordance with the North
Carolina Constitution and the United States Constitution, the tax proceeds may be used only for
the direct benefit of the jurisdiction of Beaufort County District B. None of the proceeds may be
used to promote travel or tourism in areas within Beaufort County that are outside of the district
or for tourism-related expenditures in the county that are outside of the district.
The following definitions apply in this act:
(1) Net proceeds. – Gross proceeds less the cost to the county of administering
and collecting the tax, as determined by the finance officer, not to exceed three
percent (3%) of the first five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of gross
proceeds collected each year and one percent (1%) of the remaining gross
receipts collected each year.
*S803-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Promote travel and tourism. – To advertise or market an area or activity,
publish and distribute pamphlets and other materials, conduct market research,
or engage in similar promotional activities that attract tourists or business
travelers to the area. The term includes administrative expenses incurred in
engaging in the listed activities.
(3) Tourism-related expenditures. – Expenditures that, in the judgment of the
Tourism Development Authority, are designed to increase the use of
accommodations, meeting facilities, or convention facilities in a county or to
attract tourists or business travelers to the county. The term includes
tourism-related capital expenditures.
SECTION 5.(a) Beaufort County District B Tourism Development Authority. –
Appointment and Membership. – When the Beaufort County Board of Commissioners adopts a
resolution levying a room occupancy tax under this act, it shall also adopt a resolution creating
the Beaufort County District B Tourism Development Authority, which shall be a public
authority under the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act. The resolution shall
provide for the membership of the Authority, including the members' terms of office, and for the
filling of vacancies on the Authority. At least one-third of the members must be individuals who
are affiliated with businesses that collect the tax in the district, and at least one-half of the
members must be individuals who are currently active in the promotion of travel and tourism in
the district. The board of commissioners shall designate one member of the Authority as chair
and shall determine the compensation, if any, to be paid to members of the Authority.
The Authority shall meet at the call of the chair and shall adopt rules of procedure to
govern its meetings. The Finance Officer for Beaufort County shall be the ex officio finance
officer of the Authority.
SECTION 5.(b) Duties. – The Authority shall expend the net proceeds of the tax
levied under this act for promoting travel and tourism and for tourism-related expenditures as
provided in this act.
SECTION 5.(c) Reports. – The Authority shall report quarterly and at the close of
the fiscal year to the Beaufort County Board of Commissioners on its receipts and expenditures
for the preceding quarter and for the year in such detail as the board may require.
SECTION 6. G.S. 153A-155(g) reads as rewritten:
"(g) Applicability. – Subsection (c) of this section applies to all counties and county
districts that levy an occupancy tax. To the extent subsection (c) conflicts with any provision of
a local act, subsection (c) supersedes that provision. The remainder of this section applies only
to Alleghany, Anson, Bertie, Brunswick, Buncombe, Burke, Cabarrus, Camden, Carteret,
Caswell, Chatham, Cherokee, Chowan, Clay, Craven, Cumberland, Currituck, Dare, Davie,
Duplin, Durham, Edgecombe, Forsyth, Franklin, Graham, Granville, Halifax, Haywood,
Henderson, Jackson, Madison, Martin, McDowell, Mitchell, Montgomery, Moore, Nash, New
Hanover, Northampton, Pasquotank, Pender, Perquimans, Person, Randolph, Richmond,
Rockingham, Rowan, Rutherford, Sampson, Scotland, Stanly, Stokes, Swain, Transylvania,
Tyrrell, Union, Vance, Warren, Washington, Wayne, Wilson, and Yancey Counties, to Avery
County District A, Beaufort County District B, Graham County District G, Harnett County
District H, Iredell County District I, New Hanover County District U, Pender County District P,
Surry County District S, Watauga County District U, Wilkes County District W, Yadkin County
District Y, and the Township of Averasboro in Harnett County and the Ocracoke Township
Taxing District."
SECTION 7. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 803-First Edition